North Dakota, session 69, SB2342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-01.1-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
4.1-01.1-07. Agriculture diversification and development fund - Continuing appropriation.
1. There is created in the state treasury the agriculture diversification and development fund. The
fund consists of all moneys transferred to the fund by the legislative assembly, interest upon
moneys in the fund, and payments of interest and principal on loans made from the fund.
Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the Bank of North Dakota on a continuing basis for
loan disbursements and administrative costs pursuant to this section, and moneys in the fund
are appropriated to the agriculture commissioner on a continuing basis for grants pursuant to
this section and section 4.1-01-27. The agriculture diversification and development committee
shall designate the amount available from the fund for loans, interest rate buydowns, and
grants.
2. Loans, interest rate buydowns, or grants under subsections 3 and 4 may be issued from the
fund to support new or expanding value-added agriculture businesses that demonstrate
financial feasibility, enhance profitability for farmers and ranchers, create jobs, and grow the
state's economy. Grants under section 4.1-01-27 may be issued from the fund for
infrastructure improvements necessary for the development or expansion of new or existing
value-added agriculture businesses. Value-added agriculture businesses include food
production or processing facilities; feed or pet food processing facilities; commodity
processing facilities; agriculture product manufacturers; and animal agriculture production
facilities, including swine, poultry, dairy, and feed lot production facilities.
3. The Bank of North Dakota shall develop policies for loans and interest rate buydowns from the
fund in consultation with the agriculture diversification and development committee. The Bank
shall review loan applications. To be eligible for a loan under this section, an entity shall agree
to provide the Bank with information as requested. The Bank may develop policies for loan
participation with local financial institutions. The Bank shall deposit in the fund all principal and
interest paid on the outstanding loans. The Bank may use a portion of the interest paid as a
servicing fee to pay for administrative costs, which may not exceed one-half of one percent of
the amount of the outstanding loans. The fund must be audited annually pursuant to section
6-09-29, and the cost of the audit must be paid from the fund.
4. The agricultural diversification and development committee shall develop policies for grants
from the fund to support new or expanding value-added agriculture businesses, including
eligibility criteria, maximum grant amounts, and reporting requirements. Based on
recommendations from the agricultural diversification and development committee, the
agriculture commissioner shall distribute the grant funding.
5. The agriculture diversification and development committee shall develop a value - added milk
processing facility incentive program to provide grants.

S. B. NO. 2342 - PAGE 2
a. Grant funding under this subsection is limited to the lesser of five million dollars or
five percent of the total construction cost of building or expanding a value - added milk
processing facility in the state capable of processing at least three million pounds
[1360777 kilograms] of milk each year.
b. Grant funding under the program is a reimbursement for infrastructure, site acquisition, or
other capital expenditures necessary for the value - added milk processing facility
construction, including natural gas supply, electricity supply, roads, water lines,
wastewater lines, storm water conveyance, or rail lines.
c. Upon achieving one hundred percent of the processing capacity of the value - added milk
processing facility, the agriculture commissioner shall distribute the grant award from
funding available in the agriculture diversification and development fund.
SECTION 2. BANK OF NORTH DAKOTA - LINE OF CREDIT - VALUE-ADDED MILK
PROCESSING FACILITY INCENTIVE PROGRAM. If the agriculture diversification and development
committee approves a grant under this Act, the agriculture commissioner may borrow up to $5,000,000
through a line of credit from the Bank of North Dakota for deposit in the agriculture diversification and
development fund during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The interest
rate associated with the line of credit must be the prevailing interest rate charged to North Dakota
governmental entities. If the agriculture commissioner accesses the line of credit, the agriculture
commissioner shall request a deficiency appropriation from the seventieth legislative assembly to repay
the line of credit.

S. B. NO. 2342 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2342.
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 3 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 81 Nays 11 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State